Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.996] PLAIN LANGUAGE IN LICENSE WRITTEN EXAMINATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "plain language standards" means the requirements specified in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), and the requirements of the Plain Writing Act, Public Law 111-274, and governor's Executive Order 14-07; and new text end new text begin (2) "written examination" means the written portion of an examination in English for a license issued by the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Plain language. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1, 2026, each commissioner must implement plain language standards for the written portion of a knowledge examination to ensure the written examination is a fair assessment of the license applicant's knowledge of relevant subject matter. The new written portion of the knowledge examination, to the extent practicable, must be organized to serve the reader's needs and written using clear, simplified language with the following grammatical standards: new text end new text begin (1) "you" and other pronouns address the test-taker directly; new text end new text begin (2) utilize the active voice; new text end new text begin (3) use short, simple sentences and straightforward questions; new text end new text begin (4) avoid complex and compound sentence structures; new text end new text begin (5) utilize commonly used and familiar words; new text end new text begin (6) avoid turning verbs into nouns through nominalization; new text end new text begin (7) minimize the use of abbreviations; new text end new text begin (8) place words carefully to avoid large gaps between the subject, verb, and object in a sentence; new text end new text begin (9) avoid confusing terms such as "either, or" and "neither, nor"; new text end new text begin (10) utilize simple verb tenses, including the simple present verb tense where practicable, to explain confusing or complex concepts; new text end new text begin (11) omit double negatives and terms like "except for," "unless," and "indicated otherwise"; new text end new text begin (12) avoid hidden terms and use concrete, familiar words to describe confusing or complex concepts or items; new text end new text begin (13) omit excess and unnecessary words; new text end new text begin (14) use the word "must" to express requirements; new text end new text begin (15) put exceptions at the end of a question; new text end new text begin (16) place modifying terms in correct locations; and new text end new text begin (17) any other recommended strategies and techniques designed to offer clear communication to test-takers. new text end new text begin (b) Revisions made to the written examination must meet the plain language standards of this section. new text end new text begin (c) A written examination must be reviewed for compliance with the plain language standards and approved by the revisor of statutes before implementation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPORT; PLAIN LANGUAGE IMPLEMENTATION FOR LICENSING.new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, each commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the house of representatives and the senate with primary jurisdiction for state government on the implementation of the plain language requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.996, for each license type issued by the commissioner. new text end